Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 12 Liberty of Jail Yard

10-12-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 55; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 33; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 234, § 27, effective June 20, 2012.

10-12-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-2

; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 234, § 27, effective June 20, 2012.

10-12-3.
Limits of jail yard.

The limits of each county shall be the limits of the jail yard of the county.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-3

.

10-12-4.
Entry into places within yard.

Any person confined in any correctional institution who shall give bond as provided in §

10-12-2

may go into any building or place within the exterior limits of the yard, complying with the bond and conforming to law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 33.

10-12-5.
Assignment of property by person committed on execution.

No person committed on execution shall have the liberty of the prison yard for more than thirty (30) days after his or her commitment, unless he or she shall within the thirty (30) days execute an assignment of all his or her estate of every kind not exempted from attachment by law, and wherever the same may be, to the warden of the institution and his or her successor in the office, and his or her heirs and assigns, in trust for the equal benefit of all his or her creditors in proportion to their demands.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-5

.

10-12-6.
Warden’s responsibility on assignment.

The warden receiving an assignment as provided in §

10-12-5

shall not be held responsible to any person for any property of any assignor, except such as he or she has actually received into his or her possession; provided, he or she shall assign all the interest he or she shall obtain thereby to the committing creditor, if a resident of this state, upon his or her request, or to such person, being a resident thereof, as the creditor shall name, to be held by the creditor or person so named, his or her heirs, executors, administrators and assigns, for the purposes and uses set forth in the deed, and a record of the assignment and of the transfers shall be made by the warden.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 33.

10-12-7.
Failure to report or assign to warden deemed an escape.

If any person so committed shall neglect to render himself or herself to the warden of the institution, in the institution, within thirty (30) days, or make an assignment as provided in §

10-12-5

, he or she shall be deemed to have committed an escape under his or her bond for the liberty of the jail yard.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 33.

10-12-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 33; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 234, § 27, effective June 20, 2012.

10-12-9.
Judgment on jail yard bond.

If the creditor shall obtain judgment on the bond for the breach of the condition thereof, he or she shall recover his or her just debt, with interest from the time judgment was rendered in the original suit, and twelve percent (12%) interest on the debt for his or her damages, and the court shall render judgment on the debt accordingly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-9

.

10-12-10.
Limitation of actions on jail yard bond.

No action shall be maintained for the breach of any bond given for the liberty of the jail yard as provided in §

10-12-2

, unless the action is brought within one year after the time the breach was committed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 259, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 325, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 376, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 562, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

10-12-10

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 33.